Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.535

Share the road license plates.

"Share the road license plates" means special license plates displaying a symbol or artwork recognizing an organization that promotes bicycle safety and awareness education. Share the road license plates commemorate the life of Cooper Jones.

[ 2010 c 161 s 142.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.